Nebraska, session 109, LB184.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB184 LB184
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 28-1418.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
28-1418.01 For purposes of sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.07 and
sections 4 to 6 of this act:
(1) Alternative nicotine product means any noncombustible product
containing nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether
chewed, absorbed, dissolved, or ingested by any other means. Alternative
nicotine product does not include any electronic nicotine delivery
system, cigarette, cigar, or other tobacco product, or any product
regulated as a drug or device by the United States Food and Drug
Administration under Chapter V of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic
Act;
(2) Cigarette means any product that contains nicotine, is intended
to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of
or contains (a) any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance
not containing tobacco, (b) tobacco, in any form, that is functional in
the product which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in
the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or
purchased by, consumers as a cigarette, or (c) any roll of tobacco
wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its
appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and
labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a
cigarette described in subdivision (2)(a) of this section;
(3) Delivery sale means to sell, give, or furnish products (a) by
mail or delivery service, (b) through the Internet or a computer network,
(c) by telephone, or (d) through any other electronic method;
(4)(a) Electronic nicotine delivery system means any product or
device containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives that employs
a heating element, power source, electronic circuit, or other electronic,
chemical, or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, to simulate
smoking by delivering the nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in
-2-

LB184 LB184
2025 2025
vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol form to a person inhaling from the
product or device.
(b) Electronic nicotine delivery system includes, but is not limited
to, the following:
(i) Any substance containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives, whether sold separately or sold in combination with a
product or device that is intended to deliver to a person nicotine,
tobacco, or tobacco derivatives in vapor, fog, mist, gas, or aerosol
form;
(ii) Any product or device marketed, manufactured, distributed, or
sold as an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo,
electronic pipe, electronic hookah, or similar products, names,
descriptors, or devices; and
(iii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device
that is used during operation of the product or device when sold in
combination with any substance containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives.
(c) Electronic nicotine delivery system does not include the
following:
(i) An alternative nicotine product, cigarette, cigar, or other
tobacco product, or any product regulated as a drug or device by the
United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
(ii) Any component, part, or accessory of such a product or device
that is used during operation of the product or device when not sold in
combination with any substance containing nicotine, tobacco, or tobacco
derivatives;
(5) Self-service display means a retail display that contains a
tobacco product, a tobacco-derived product, an electronic nicotine
delivery system, or an alternative nicotine product and is located in an
area openly accessible to a retailer's customers and from which such
-3-

LB184 LB184
2025 2025
customers can readily access the product without the assistance of a
salesperson. Self-service display does not include a display case that
holds tobacco products, tobacco-derived products, electronic nicotine
delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products behind locked doors;
and
(6) Tobacco specialty store means a retail store that (a) derives at
least seventy-five percent of its revenue from tobacco products, tobacco-
derived products, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative
nicotine products and (b) does not permit persons under the age of
twenty-one years to enter the premises unless accompanied by a parent or
legal guardian.
Sec. 2. Section 28-1425, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1425 Any licensee who shall sell, give, or furnish in any way to
any person under the age of twenty-one years, or who shall willingly
allow to be taken from his or her place of business by any person under
the age of twenty-one years, any cigars, tobacco, cigarettes, cigarette
material, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine
products is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any officer, director, or
manager having charge or control, either separately or jointly with
others, of the business of any corporation which violates sections
28-1419, 28-1420 to 28-1429, and 28-1429.03 to 28-1429.07 and sections 4
to 6 of this act, if he or she has knowledge of such violation, shall be
subject to the penalties provided in this section. In addition to the
penalties provided in this section, such licensee shall be subject to the
additional penalty of a revocation and forfeiture of his, her, their, or
its license, at the discretion of the court before whom the complaint for
violation of such sections may be heard. If such license is revoked and
forfeited, all rights under such license shall at once cease and
terminate and a new license shall not be issued until the expiration of
the period provided for in section 28-1429.
-4-

LB184 LB184
2025 2025
Sec. 3. Section 28-1429, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1429 (1) If a license issued under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 is
revoked and forfeited as provided in section 28-1425 or section 4 of this
act for a violation of section 28-1429.04, or 28-1429.05, or section 4 of
this act, no new license shall be issued to such licensee until the
expiration of five years after the date of such revocation and
forfeiture.
(2) If a license issued under sections 28-1420 to 28-1429 is revoked
and forfeited as provided in section 28-1425 for any other violation of
sections 28-1418 to 28-1429.03, 28-1429.06, and 28-1429.07 and sections 5
and 6 of this act, no new license shall be issued to such licensee until
the expiration of one year after the date of such revocation and
forfeiture except as otherwise provided in section 28-1423.
Sec. 4. (1) No tobacco specialty store shall sell, offer for sale,
or distribute any object containing nitrous oxide in any form or
willingly allow such an object to be taken from such store by any person.
A person holding a license for a tobacco specialty store under sections
28-1420 to 28-1429 who violates this subsection shall:
(a) Be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor for the first offense;
(b) Be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor for any second or subsequent
offense; and
(c) Be subject to the additional penalty of revocation and
forfeiture of such license, at the discretion of the court before whom
the complaint for a violation of this subsection may be heard. If such
license is revoked and forfeited, all rights under such license shall at
once cease and terminate and a new license shall not be issued until the
expiration of the period provided for in section 28-1429.
(2) All objects containing nitrous oxide that are sold, offered for
sale, given, or furnished in violation of this section are subject to
seizure, forfeiture, and destruction. The cost of such seizure,
-5-

LB184 LB184
2025 2025
forfeiture, and destruction shall be borne by the person from whom the
products are seized.
Sec. 5. (1) A person holding a license under sections 28-1420 to
28-1429 shall not, by delivery sale, sell, give, or furnish to any
consumer in this state any object containing nitrous oxide in any form. A
violation of this subsection is a Class I misdemeanor.
(2) Any common carrier that knowingly transports any object
containing nitrous oxide in any form for a person who is in violation of
subsection (1) of this section is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(3) In addition to any other penalty, a violation of this section
shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under the Uniform Deceptive
Trade Practices Act and shall be subject to any remedies or penalties
available for a violation of such act.
(4) All objects containing nitrous oxide that are sold, offered for
sale, given, or furnished in violation of this section are subject to
seizure, forfeiture, and destruction and shall not be purchased or sold
in the state. The cost of such seizure, forfeiture, and destruction shall
be borne by the person from whom the products are seized.
(5) This section does not apply to the following:
(a) The shipment of an object containing nitrous oxide to a foreign
trade zone that is established under 19 U.S.C. 81a et seq. and that is
located in this state if the products are from outside of this country,
were ordered by a distributor in another state, and are not distributed
in this state; or
(b) A government employee who is acting in the course of the
employee's official duties.
Sec. 6. (1) A person shall not sell, offer for sale, or distribute
an object that is specifically designed for inhaling nitrous oxide for
recreational purposes or that the person knows will be used to inhale
nitrous oxide for recreational purposes.
(2) Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section shall:
-6-

LB184 LB184
2025 2025
(a) For the first offense, be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor; and
(b) For the second and all subsequent offenses, be guilty of a Class
II misdemeanor.
(3) All objects containing nitrous oxide that are sold, offered for
sale, given, or furnished in violation of this section are subject to
seizure, forfeiture, and destruction. The cost of such seizure,
forfeiture, and destruction shall be borne by the person from whom the
products are seized.
Sec. 7. Section 59-1523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
59-1523 (1) The cigarette tax division of the Tax Commissioner may,
after notice and hearing, revoke or suspend for any violation of section
59-1520 the:
(a) License or licenses of any person licensed under sections
28-1418 to 28-1429.07 and sections 4 to 6 of this act or sections 77-2601
to 77-2622; or
(b) License or certification of any person licensed or certified
under the Tobacco Products Tax Act.
(2) Cigarettes that are acquired, held, owned, possessed,
transported, sold, or distributed in or imported into this state in
violation of section 59-1520 are declared to be contraband goods and are
subject to seizure and forfeiture. Any cigarettes so seized and forfeited
shall be destroyed. Such cigarettes shall be declared to be contraband
goods whether the violation of section 59-1520 is knowing or otherwise.
Sec. 8. Original sections 28-1418.01, 28-1425, 28-1429, and
59-1523, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-